Utah statutes.
31A-14-209.   Requirements for incorporated alien insurers.
(1)  No incorporated alien insurer may be authorized to do business in Utah
unless, in addition to the requirements of Section 31A-14-201, it satisfies
all of the following:
(a)  It has operated for three years in its domicile or the commissioner finds
other grounds for being confident that it will be solid during its formative
period.
(b)  It supplies and commits itself to maintain in the United States a deposit
or bond in an amount the commissioner considers sufficient to protect the
interests of insureds, creditors, and the public in Utah.
(c)  It files an agreement with the commissioner as required by the
commissioner regarding its records, reports, and submission to examinations.
This agreement shall include a commitment to keep its records, reports, and
other documents relevant to its United States business constantly available in
full in the English language, and to keep these records and make its reports
on its United States business in a form which satisfies the commissioner.
(2)  A deposit under Subsection (1)(b) may be made as specified in Section
31A-2-206 or it may be made in another state with a custodian approved by the
commissioner.  The deposit shall be in trust for those persons the
commissioner considers appropriate to protect the interests of insureds,
creditors, and the public in Utah.  The custodian shall supply a certificate
of the deposit in the form and at the intervals reasonably required by the
commissioner.
(3)  A bond satisfies Subsection (1)(b) if it is issued by an insurer
authorized to do a surety business in Utah and is conditioned on
nonperformance of any obligation to those persons the commissioner considers
appropriate in protecting the interests of insureds, creditors, and the public
in Utah.  Each bond shall cover any claims that arise out of occurrences prior
to the termination of the bond, and may not be terminable on any ground
without at least 30 days notice to the commissioner.  Each bond shall be in
the form and be renewed at the intervals reasonably required by the
commissioner.
